botl.lexd
PATTERNS
adj abs
((adj_class[nm] (adj_root[l] | adj_root[b])) | (adj_root[r] | adj_root[a])) obl_stem[nm]  (obl_case[ngen] | obl_case[nm])
((adj_class[m] (adj_root[l] | adj_root[b])) | (adj_root[r] | adj_root[a])) obl_stem[m]  (obl_case[ngen] | obl_case[m])
((adj_class[an.pl.p] (adj_root[l] | adj_root[b])) | (adj_root[r] | adj_root[a])) obl_stem[pl]  (obl_case[ngen] | obl_case[nm] | obl_case[m.pl])
((adj_class[inan.pl] (adj_root[l] | adj_root[b])) | (adj_root[r] | adj_root[a])) obl_stem[pl]  (obl_case[ngen] | obl_case[nm])

PATTERN adj
adj_root[a]
adj_class[-an.pl.s] adj_root[l] 
adj_root[r] adj_class[-an.pl.p]
adj_class[-an.pl.s] adj_root[b] adj_class[-an.pl.p]

LEXICON adj_root
аруссу[r]     # local
ечIуха[l]     # big
ачIа[b]       # selected
гIалхул[a]    # wild

LEXICON adj_class
<f>[nm]:й[nm]
<n>[nm]:б[nm]  
<m>[m]:в[m]
<an.pl>[an.pl.p]:р[an.pl.p]  
<an.pl>[an.pl.s]:л[an.pl.s]  
<inan.pl>[inan.pl]:б[inan.pl]

LEXICON abs
<abs>:

LEXICON obl_case
<erg>:ди
<dat>:й

LEXICON obl_stem
<obl.m>[m]:щу[m]
<obl.nm>[nm]:лълъи[nm]
<obl.pl>[pl]:лу[pl]

LEXICON obl_case
<erg>[ngen]:ди[ngen]
<dat>[ngen]:й[ngen]
<gen>[nm]:>лъи[nm]
<f(gen)>[m]:й[m]
<n(gen)>[m]:б[m]  
<m(gen)>[m]:в[m]
<an.pl(gen)>[m.pl]:л[m.pl]  
<inan.pl(gen)>[m.pl]:б[m.pl]
